hr-HR: Veličina navoja na graničniku: 5/16" na vijak; 5/8" imperijalno; 5/8" metričko; Ostalo
vi: Kích thước ren của trục chặn mũi giày: Bắt vít 5/16"; 5/8" hệ đo lường Anh; 5/8" hệ mét; Khác
hu: Orrfék szárának menetmérete: 5/16" csavaros; 5/8" angolszász; 5/8" metrikus; Egyéb
zh-TW: 煞車頭螺柱螺紋尺寸: 5/16" 螺栓固定; 5/8" 英制; 5/8" 公制; 其他
nb: Gjengestørrelse på tåstoppstamme: 5/16" påskrudd; 5/8" tommer; 5/8" metrisk; Annet
pl: Rozmiar gwintu trzpienia stopera: Wkręcany 5/16"; 5/8" (imperialny); 5/8" (metryczny); Inny
sv: Gängstorlek för tåstoppsskaft: 5/16" påbultad; 5/8" imperial; 5/8" metrisk; Övrigt
fr: Taille du filetage de la tige de frein: Boulonné 5/16"; Impérial 5/8"; Métrique 5/8"; Autre
zh-CN: 止滑头杆螺纹尺寸: 5/16" 螺栓固定; 5/8" 英制; 5/8" 公制; 其他
nl: Toe stop steel schroefdraadmaat: 5/16" aangeschroefd; 5/8" imperiaal; 5/8" metrisch; Overige
lt-LT: Pirštų stabdžio koto sriegio dydis: 5/16 col. prisukamas; 5/8 col. colinis; 5/8 col. metrinis; Kita
ja: トウストップステムねじサイズ: 5/16インチ ボルトオン; 5/8インチ インペリアル; 5/8インチ メトリック; その他
es: Tamaño de la rosca del vástago del toe stop: Atornillable de 5/16"; Imperial de 5/8"; Métrica de 5/8"; Otro
ko: 토 스톱 스템 나사산 사이즈: 5/16" 볼트온; 5/8" 임페리얼; 5/8" 미터법; 기타
fi: Kärkijarrun kannan kierrekoko: 5/16" pultattava; 5/8" tuumakierre; 5/8" metrikierre; Muu
pt-BR: Haste de freio dianteiro tamanho da rosca: Parafusado 5/16"; Imperial 5/8"; Métrico 5/8"; Outros
bg-BG: Размер на резбата на стопера за пръсти: 5/16" с болт; 5/8" имперски; 5/8" метричен; Друго
ro-RO: Dimensiunea filetului pentru opritorul patinelor: 5/16" cu șurub; 5/8" imperial; 5/8" metric; Altele
sl-SI: Velikost navoja stebla prstne zavore: 5/16" na vijak; 5/8" imperialni navoj; 5/8" metrični navoj; Drugo
it: Misura della filettatura dello stelo del fermapunta: Fissaggio con bullone da 5/16"; 5/8" imperiale; 5/8" metrico; Altro
el: Μέγεθος σπειρώματος στελέχους φρένου toe stop: Βιδωτό 5/16"; 5/8" imperial; 5/8" metric; Άλλο
de: Gewindegröße des Toe-Stop-Schafts: 5/16" geschraubt; 5/8" zöllig; 5/8" metrisch; Sonstige
da: Gevindstørrelse for toe stop-stamme: 5/16" bolt-on; 5/8" imperial; 5/8" metrisk; Andet
pt-PT: Tamanho da rosca da haste do travão dianteiro: Aparafusado 5/16"; Imperial 5/8"; Métrico 5/8"; Outro
sk-SK: Veľkosť závitu skrutky stonky brzdovej pätky: 5/16" skrutkovací; 5/8" imperiálny; 5/8" metrický; Iné
en: Toe stop stem thread size: 5/16" bolt-on; 5/8" imperial; 5/8" metric; Other
th: ขนาดเกลียวก้านหยุดนิ้วเท้า: ขันนอต 5/16"; อิมพีเรียล 5/8"; เมตริก 5/8"; อื่นๆ
cs: Velikost závitu dříku brzdy: 5/16" šroubovací; 5/8" imperiální; 5/8" metrický; Jiné
ru: Размер резьбы штока стопора: На болтах 5/16"; Дюймовая 5/8"; Метрическая 5/8"; Другое
tr: Burun freni sap diş ölçüsü: 5/16" cıvatalı; 5/8" inç (İmparatorluk); 5/8" metrik; Diğer